Utah statutes.
53A-25b-104.   Corporate powers.

(1)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind is a public corporation with perpetual succession and a corporate seal.

(2)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind may:

(a)  sue and be sued;

(b)  contract and be contracted with;

(c)  take and hold by purchase, gift, devise, or bequest real and personal property required for its uses; and

(d)  convert property, if not suitable for its use, into other property or money.

(3)  The property of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind is exempt from taxes and assessments.

